src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
abiicio/B
aboleo/B
abrado/B
abscedo/B
abscido/B
abscindo/B
absolvo/B
absorbeo/B
abstineo/B
abstraho/B
absumo/B
accedo/B
accendo/B
accido/B
accipio/B
accresco/B
accurro/B
acquiro/B
acuo/B
adaugeo/B
addo/B
adduco/B
adhaereo/B
adhaeresco/B
adhibeo/B
adiaceo/B
adigo/B
adiicio/B
adimo/B
adipiscor/B
adiungo/B
admisceo/B
admitto/B
admoneo/B
admoveo/B
adnecto/B
adpendo/B
adpingo/B
adquiro/B
adscribo/B
adsequor/B
adstruo/B
adtingo/B
adtraho/B
adtribuo/B
adverto/B
aequependeo/B
aequivaleo/B
afficio/B
aggredior/B
agnosco/B
ago/B
allicio/B
alo/B
amitto/B
animadverto/B
annitor/B
antepono/B
appendo/B
applaudo/B
apprehendo/B
ardeo/B
arguo/B
arripio/B
ascribo/B
assequor/B
assisto/B
assuesco/B
astruo/B
attero/B
attollo/B
attribuo/B
audeo/B
averto/B
cado/B
calefacio/B
candeo/B
capesso/B
careo/B
caveo/B
censeo/B
cieo/B
circumduco/B
circumfundo/B
circumscribo/B
circumvenio/B
circundo/B
claudo/B
coarguo/B
coerceo/B
cogo/B
cohibeo/B
collabor/B
colo/B
comminiscor/B
commisceo/B
compatior/B
complector/B
complettor/B
comprehendo/B
comprimo/B
concedo/B
concipio/B
concurro/B
condo/B
conecto/B
confido/B
confingo/B
confluo/B
congero/B
congruo/B
coniicio/B
connecto/B
conquiesco/B
consequor/B
conspicio/B
construo/B
consulo/B
consuo/B
contemno/B
contero/B
contineo/B
contradico/B
contranitocrr/B
contrapendo/B
convalesco/B
convinco/B
coquo/B
corrigo/B
corrodo/B
corruo/B
cresco/B
cupio/B
debeo/B
decerno/B
decipio/B
decumbo/B
deduco/B
deflecto/B
dego/B
deligo/B
demergo/B
demitto/B
demulceo/B
depingo/B
deprendo/B
depromo/B
describo/B
desino/B
destituo/B
desumo/B
detorqueo/B
detrudo/B
diffundo/B
dignosco/B
diligo/B
dimitto/B
dirigo/B
discedo/B
discindo/B
discurro/B
disiungo/B
dispesco/B
dispono/B
dissideo/B
distraho/B
diverto/B
doceo/B
duco/B
educo/B
effingo/B
effundo/B
egredior/B
elabor/B
elido/B
eludo/B
emineo/B
emungo/B
erigo/B
erubesco/B
evado/B
everto/B
excandesco/B
excello/B
excido/B
excludo/B
excudo/B
exequor/B
exhibeo/B
eximo/B
expello/B
expeto/B
explodo/B
exposco/B
expungo/B
exquiro/B
extendo/B
extollo/B
extruo/B
exuro/B
fallo/B
figo/B
fingo/B
flecto/B
foveo/B
fugio/B
fungor/B
geno/B
gigno/B
habeo/B
horresco/B
iacio/B
ico/B
ignosco/B
illido/B
illucesco/B
immergo/B
immitto/B
impendeo/B
impeto/B
impono/B
incedo/B
incido/B
includo/B
incurro/B
indigeo/B
induco/B
infigo/B
influo/B
ingero/B
ingredior/B
inhaeresco/B
innitor/B
innuo/B
inscribo/B
insero/B
insisto/B
instituo/B
instruo/B
intellego/B
intendo/B
intercido/B
intercludo/B
interiacio/B
interimo/B
intermitto/B
interpono/B
intersero/B
intexo/B
introduco/B
intueor/B
inverto/B
irrumpo/B
iungo/B
labor/B
languesco/B
lentesco/B
loquor/B
ludo/B
magnifacio/B
marceo/B
metuo/B
misceo/B
moneo/B
nanciscor/B
necto/B
negligo/B
noceo/B
notesco/B
obliviscor/B
obsideo/B
obsto/B
obtundo/B
occludo/B
occurro/B
offundo/B
oppono/B
parco/B
partior/B
pateo/B
patior/B
pendeo/B
perago/B
percurro/B
perdisco/B
pereo/B
perfluo/B
perimo/B
permitto/B
perquiro/B
perspicio/B
perstringo/B
pertineo/B
perverto/B
pinso/B
poeniteo/B
polliceor/B
porrigo/B
possido/B
postpono/B
praecedo/B
praecipio/B
praeficio/B
praemitto/B
praeripio/B
praestruo/B
praetermitto/B
premo/B
procido/B
procurro/B
produco/B
profiteor/B
profundo/B
progredior/B
proiicio/B
promineo/B
promo/B
propello/B
proseco/B
protendo/B
proveho/B
pudeo/B
quaeso/B
quiesco/B
rarefacio/B
recenseo/B
recipio/B
recolligo/B
recutio/B
redigo/B
reflecto/B
refringo/B
refundo/B
regredior/B
relinquo/B
remitto/B
reor/B
repercutio/B
repleo/B
repono/B
requiro/B
resideo/B
resolvo/B
respondeo/B
restituo/B
retineo/B
retundo/B
reviso/B
revivo/B
rideo/B
rubesco/B
sapio/B
satisfacio/B
scindo/B
secedo/B
secludo/B
seiungo/B
sequor/B
sisto/B
solvo/B
sperno/B
sterno/B
struo/B
subduco/B
subiicio/B
subscribo/B
subsequor/B
substituo/B
subtendo/B
subtraho/B
succendo/B
succurro/B
sufficio/B
superaddo/B
superpono/B
suppeto/B
suppono/B
suscipio/B
suspicio/B
sustollo/B
tango/B
tendo/B
tergo/B
torqueo/B
traduco/B
traiicio/B
transmitto/B
transpono/B
tremefacio/B
tribuo/B
ulciscor/B
utor/B
valeo/B
vello/B
verto/B
vinco/B
viresco/B
volvo/B
